Utah statutes.
67-5-7.   Establishment of career service system.

(1)  The purpose of this chapter is to establish a career service system for employees of the Office of the Attorney General that will attract and retain employees of proven ability and experience who will devote their full time to the service of the state.

(2)  The Office of the Attorney General may adopt policies necessary to implement this chapter, including personnel and work policies different from those made by the Department of Human Resource Management.



Amended by Chapter 166, 2007 General Session

